Utah statutes.
73-10c-4.5.   Nonpoint source project loans and grants -- Project objectives -- Water Quality Board duties.

(1)  The Water Quality Board may make a loan from the Utah Wastewater Loan Program Subaccount created in Subsection 73-10c-5(2)(a) or from the Utah State Revolving Fund for Wastewater Projects Subaccount created in Subsection 73-10c-5(2)(b) or a grant from the Hardship Grant Program for Wastewater Projects Subaccount created in Subsection 73-10c-5(2)(c) to a political subdivision, individual, corporation, association, state or federal agency, or other private entity to acquire, construct, or implement a nonpoint source project.

(2)  The Water Quality Board may only award a loan or grant for a nonpoint source project that will achieve one or more of the following objectives:

(a)  abate or reduce raw sewage discharges;

(b)  repair or replace failing individual on-site wastewater disposal systems;

(c)  abate or reduce untreated or uncontrolled runoff;

(d)  improve critical aquatic habitat resources;

(e)  conserve soil, water, or other natural resources;

(f)  protect and improve ground water quality;

(g)  preserve and protect the beneficial uses of waters of the state;

(h)  reduce the number of water bodies not achieving water quality standards;

(i)  improve watershed management; or

(j)  prepare and implement total maximum daily load (TMDL) assessments.

(3)  The Water Quality Board shall:

(a)  determine the amount, term, and interest rate for each loan made under this section;

(b)  assure that adequate security is obtained for each loan;

(c)  establish criteria and procedures for determining priority nonpoint source projects and award loans in accordance with those priorities; and

(d)  make rules to implement this section in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

